Utah statutes.
10-6-127.   Review of individual fund budgets -- Hearing.

(1) (a)  Upon the written request of one of the members of the governing body, or upon its own motion setting forth the reason therefor, the governing body may, at any time during the budget period, review the individual budgets of the funds set forth in Section 10-6-109, for the purpose of determining if the total of any of them should be increased.

(b)  If the governing body decides that the budget total of one or more of these funds should be increased, it shall follow the procedures set forth in Sections 10-6-113 and 10-6-114 for holding a public hearing.

(2) (a)  In a city that has adopted a fiscal period that is a biennial period under Subsection 10-6-105(2), the governing body shall, in a public hearing before June 30 of the first year of the biennial period, review the individual budgets of the funds set forth in Sections 10-6-109 and 10-6-135 for the second year of the biennial period.

(b)  In each review under Subsection (2)(a), the governing body shall follow the procedures of Sections 10-6-113 and 10-6-114 for holding a public hearing.



Amended by Chapter 300, 1999 General Session

